bg-BG: Тип ван: Товарен микробус; Преобразуван микробус; Миниван; Пътнически микробус; Други
de: Transportertyp: Transporter; Abgewandelter Transporter; Minivan; Personenwagen; Sonstiges
el: Τύπος βαν: φορτηγό φορτηγό; Βαν μετατροπής; Μίνιβαν; Επιβατικό βαν; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ dodávky: Nákladná dodávka; Konverzná dodávka; Minivan; Osobná dodávka; Iné
ro-RO: Tip furgonetă: Furgonetă; Furgoneta de conversie; Minivan; Furgonetă de pasageri; Altele
fi: Pakettiautotyyppi: Kuorma-auto; Muunneltu pakettiauto; Minibussi; Henkilöpakettiauto; Muu
ja: バンタイプ: 貨物バン; 改造バン; ミニバン; 乗用バン; その他
vi: Loại xe van: Xe van chở hàng; Xe van chuyển đổi; Xe minivan; Xe van chở khách; Khác
nl: Bestelwagentype: Bestelwagen; Conversion van; Minivan; Passagiersbusje; Andere
en: Van type: Cargo van; Conversion van; Minivan; Passenger van; Other
th: ประเภทรถตู้: คาร์โกแวน; รถตู้แปลง; มินิแวน; รถตู้โดยสาร; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta kombija: Tovorni kombi; Predelan kombi; Enoprostorec; Potniški kombi; Drugo
ru: Тип фургона: Грузовой фургон; Переделанный фургон; Минивэн; Пассажирский фургон; Другое
da: Varevognstype: Varevogn; Ombygningsvogn; Minivan; Personbil; Andet
ko: 밴 유형: 카고 밴; 컨버전 밴; 미니밴; 승용 밴; 기타
lt-LT: Furgono tipas: Krovininis furgonas; Perdaromas vurgonas; Minivenas; Keleivinis furgonas; Kita
it: Tipo di furgone: Furgone da carico; Furgone di conversione; Minivan; Furgone passeggeri; Altro
cs: Typ dodávkového automobilu: Nákladní dodávka; Přestavbová dodávka; Minivan; Osobní dodávka; Jiné
pl: Typ furgonetki: Furgonetka; Furgonetka po przeróbkach; Minivan; Furgonetka osobowa; Inne
sv: Typ av skåpbil: Lastvan; Konverteringsvan; Minivan; Passagerarvan; Övrigt
zh-CN: 厢式车类型: 货运车; 改装货车; 小型货车; 厢式客车; 其他
hu: Kisteherautó típusa: Teherszállító furgon; Átalakító furgon; Minibusz; Személyszállító furgon; Egyéb
pt-PT: Tipo de carrinha: Carrinha de carga; Carrinha convertida; Minicarrinha; Carrinha de passageiros; Outro
nb: Varebiltype: Varebil; Konverteringsbil; Minivan; Personbil; Annet
hr-HR: Vrsta kombija: Teretni kombi; Kompleti za pretvorbu; Minikombi; Putnički kombi; Ostalo
tr: Kamyonet Tipi: Yük kamyoneti; Conversion van; Minivan; Minibüs; Diğer
zh-TW: 廂式車類型: 廂式貨車; 改裝貨車; 小型貨車; 廂式客車; 其他
es: Tipo de furgoneta: Furgoneta de carga; Furgoneta de conversión; Minivan; Furgoneta de pasajeros; Otros
fr: Type de fourgon: Fourgon utilitaire; Fourgon de conversion; Minivan; Fourgon de passagers; Autre
pt-BR: Tipo de van: Furgão de carga; Furgão convertido; Minivan; Van de passageiros; Outro